Florida, session 2026, HB1203.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 383.142, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
383.142 Education on congenital cytomegalovirus.—The
Department of Health, in consultation with medical experts
identified by the department, shall develop educational
materials on congenital cytomegalovirus to be distributed to
expectant and new parents or caregivers as part of any
maternity, prenatal, or newborn services or education provided
by hospitals, birth centers, or obstetrics and gynecology
physician practices in this state.
(1) The educational materials must include, but need not
be limited to, an explanation of all of the following:
(a) The causes, symptoms, and effects of cytomegalovirus
infection and the ways it can be prevented. The materials must
emphasize the fact that the virus can spread from person to
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1203 2026
person without detection and can be particularly dangerous if
transmitted from a pregnant woman to her child as congenital
cytomegalovirus.
(b) The manner in which congenital cytomegalovirus, if
contracted, can lead to neurological issues, such as seizures,
cerebral palsy, and developmental delays; sensory loss, such as
hearing and vision loss; physical problems, such as low birth
weight, jaundice, and enlarged liver and spleen; and, in severe
cases, pregnancy loss. The materials must emphasize the
importance of early testing for congenital cytomegalovirus in
newborns and infants to preserve their health and prevent
lifelong health complications.
(c) The screening requirements of s. 383.145.
(2) Each hospital, birth center, and obstetrics and
gynecology physician practice in this state providing maternity,
prenatal, or newborn services or education shall provide the
educational materials developed by the department under this
section to expectant or new parents or caregivers receiving such
services or education. The department shall provide the
educational materials to child care facilities and any other
entity deemed relevant by the department.
Section 2. Section 456.0302, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
456.0302 Requirement for instruction on congenital
cytomegalovirus.—
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1203 2026
(1) Beginning July 1, 2026, the applicable board shall
require each person licensed under chapter 458, chapter 459,
part I of chapter 464, or chapter 467 to complete a 1-hour
continuing education course, approved by the board, on
congenital cytomegalovirus as part of initial licensure and
every other biennial licensure renewal. The approved course must
include instruction on all of the following:
(a) The causes, symptoms, and effects of cytomegalovirus
infection and the ways it can be prevented.
(b) The manner in which congenital cytomegalovirus, if
contracted, can lead to neurological issues, sensory loss,
physical problems, and, in severe cases, pregnancy loss.
(c) The screening requirements of s. 383.145 and the
importance of early testing for congenital cytomegalovirus in
newborns and infants to preserve their health and prevent
lifelong health complications.
(2) Each such licensee must submit confirmation of having
completed such course, on a form provided by the board, when
submitting fees for every other biennial licensure renewal.
(3) Each board that requires a licensee to complete
continuing education under this section shall include the hour
required for completion of the course in the total hours of
continuing education required by law for such profession unless
the continuing education requirements for such profession
100 consist of fewer than 30 hours biennially.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1203 2026
101 (4) A person holding two or more licenses subject to this
102 section may show proof of having completed one board-approved
103 course on congenital cytomegalovirus for purposes of relicensure
104 for additional licenses.
105 (5) Failure to comply with the requirements of this
106 section constitutes grounds for disciplinary action under each
107 respective practice act and under s. 456.072(1)(k). In addition
108 to discipline by the board, the licensee must be required to
109 complete such course.
110 (6) Each board may adopt rules to implement this section.
111 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1203-00